Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 13
ELECTION OFFENSES

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980. This article was numbered as article 21 of chapter 49, C.R.S. 1963. For additional historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment of articles 1 to 13 of this title in 1980, see the editor's note immediately following the title heading for this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1980.

Cross references:

For applicability of this article to special district elections, see § 32-1-807; for election offenses in municipal elections, see part 15 of article 10 of title 31.

Section

PART 1 OFFENSES - GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 OFFENSES - QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

PART 3 OFFENSES - POLITICAL PARTY ORGANIZATION

PART 4 OFFENSES - ACCESS TO BALLOT BY CANDIDATE

PART 5 (Reserved)

PART 6 OFFENSES - NOTICE AND PREPARATION FOR ELECTIONS

PART 7 OFFENSES - CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

PART 8 OFFENSES - MAIL VOTING AND VOTING BY NEW RESIDENTS

PART 9 (Reserved)